Utah statutes.
10-2-112.   Ballot used at the incorporation election.

(1)  The ballot at the incorporation election under Subsection 10-2-111(1) shall pose the incorporation question substantially as follows:

Shall the area described as (insert a description of the proposed city) be incorporated as the city of (insert the proposed name of the proposed city)?

(2)  The ballot shall provide a space for the voter to answer yes or no to the question in Subsection (1).

(3) (a)  The ballot at the incorporation election shall also pose the question relating to the form of government substantially as follows:

If the above incorporation proposal passes, under what form of municipal government shall (insert the name of the proposed city) operate? Vote for one:

Five-member council form

Six-member council form

Five-member council-mayor form

Seven-member council-mayor form.

(b)  The ballot shall provide a space for the voter to vote for one form of government.

(4) (a)  The ballot at the incorporation election shall also pose the question of whether to elect city council members by district substantially as follows:

If the above incorporation proposal passes, shall members of the city council of (insert the name of the proposed city) be elected by district?

(b)  The ballot shall provide a space for the voter to answer yes or no to the question in Subsection (4)(a).

